California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(1) One billion sixty-five million dollars ($1,065,000,000) of the proceeds of the bonds, after allocation of bond proceeds to the purposes described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), shall be used for the loans or grants, loan or grant implementation, and loan or grant oversight described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and administrative costs. Administrative costs shall not exceed 3 percent of all bond proceeds allocated for purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), as described in this paragraph.

(2) Nine hundred twenty-two million dollars ($922,000,000) of the proceeds of the bonds, after allocation of bond proceeds to the purposes described in paragraph (4) of
 subdivision (a), shall be used for the loans or grants, loan or grant implementation, and loan or grant oversight, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and administrative costs. Administrative costs shall not exceed 3 percent of all bond proceeds allocated for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), as described in this paragraph.

(3) One billion five hundred million dollars ($1,500,000,000) of the proceeds of the bonds shall be awarded to cities, counties, city and counties, and tribal entities, after allocation of bond proceeds to the purposes described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) for grants, grant implementation, and grant oversight, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), and administrative costs. Of this amount, thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be designated to tribal entities.

(4) Up to two billion eight hundred ninety-three
 million dollars ($2,893,000,000) of the proceeds of the bonds, after allocation of bond proceeds to the purposes of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), shall be used for grants, grant implementation, and grant oversight, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), and administrative costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 48, Sec. 20.   (AB 166)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.05.

(a) (1) Bonds in the total amount of six billion three hundred eighty million dollars ($6,380,000,000) not including the amount of refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 5965.14, may be issued and sold for the purposes expressed in this chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code.

(2) The bonds, when sold, issued, and
 delivered, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) (1) The Treasurer shall issue and sell the bonds authorized in subdivision (a) in the amount determined by the committee to be necessary or desirable pursuant to Section 5965.08. The bonds shall be issued and sold upon the terms and conditions specified in a resolution to be adopted by the committee pursuant to Section 16731 of the Government Code.

(2) The bonds shall be issued and sold upon the terms and conditions specified in a resolution to be adopted by
 the committee pursuant to Section 5965.08.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.06.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), as amended, from time to time, and all of the provisions of that law, as amended, apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter, except that subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16727 of the Government Code shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.07.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the Behavioral Health Infrastructure Bond Act Finance Committee is hereby created.

(b) (1) The committee consists of the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, a member may designate a representative to act as that member in the member’s place, for all purposes, as though the member were
 personally present.

(c) (1) The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the
 committee.

(2) A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.08.

(a) The committee shall determine, by resolution, whether it is necessary or desirable to issue and sell bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter to carry out the actions specified in this chapter and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold.

(b) Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.09.

(a) There shall be collected each year, and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds becoming due each year.

(b) It is the duty of all officers charged by law with a duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.10.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby continuously appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter and without regard to fiscal years, an amount that equals the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 5965.11.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.11.

(a) For the purpose of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter, excluding refunding bonds authorized pursuant to Section 5965.14 less any amount loaned pursuant to Section 5965.12 and not yet repaid, and any amount withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to this section and not yet returned to the General Fund.

(b) Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund.

(c) Any
 moneys made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, with interest at the rate earned by the moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.12.

(a) The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(b) The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter, excluding refunding bonds authorized pursuant to Section 5965.14, less any amount loaned pursuant to this section and not yet repaid and withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to Section 5965.11 and not yet returned to the General Fund.

(c) The board shall execute documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan.

(d) Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.13.

All moneys deposited in the fund that are derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold pursuant to this chapter shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest, except that amounts derived from premium may be reserved and used to pay costs of bond issuance before any transfer to the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.14.

(a) The bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter includes the approval of the issuance of bonds issued to refund bonds originally issued under this chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(c) A bond refunded with the proceeds of refunding bonds, as authorized by this section, may be legally
 defeased to the extent permitted by law in the manner and to the extent set forth in the resolution, as amended, authorizing that refunded bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.15.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, under designated conditions, or is otherwise entitled to a federal tax advantage, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and the investment earnings on those proceeds.

(b) The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay a rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or to take any other action with respect
 to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, required or desirable under federal law, to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.16.

The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, and the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5966.

(a) (1) The Department of Housing and Community Development, in coordination with the Department of Veterans Affairs, shall determine the methodology and distribution of the funds provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 5965.04, used for the purposes provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5965.04.

(2) The Department of Housing and Community Development and the Department of Veterans Affairs shall work in coordination pursuant to a memorandum of understanding.

(b) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall determine the methodology and distribution of the funds provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5965.04, used for the purposes provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5965.04.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5966.02.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, funds allocated for the purposes specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5965.04 shall be disbursed in accordance with subdivisions (a) to (h), inclusive, of Section 50675.1.3 of the Health and Safety Code and any associated guidelines changes to that program, as provided in the Multifamily Housing Program in Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code, and this chapter, consistent with applicable law and guidance.

(2) The
 Department of Housing and Community Development shall issue guidance regarding implementation by July 1, 2025.

(b) In developing the methodology and distribution of funds referenced in subdivision (a) of Section 5966, the Department of Housing and Community Development shall consult with the Department of Veterans Affairs regarding supportive services plan standards and other program areas where the Department of Veterans Affairs holds expertise for the purposes specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5965.04.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5967.

The Department of Health Care Services shall determine the methodology and distribution of the funds provided pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 5965.04, used for the purposes provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 5965.04.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5967.01.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, funds allocated for the purposes specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5965.04 shall be disbursed in accordance with the Behavioral Health Continuum Infrastructure Program (commencing with Section 5960), and this chapter, consistent with applicable law and guidance.

(b) The Department of Health Care Services shall issue guidance regarding the implementation of this article by July 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. The Community Assistance, Recovery, and Empowerment Act [5970. - 5987.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [5970. - 5971.]

5970.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Community Assistance, Recovery, and Empowerment (CARE) Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 283, Sec. 2.   (SB 35)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5970.5.

This part shall be implemented as follows, with technical assistance and continuous quality improvement, pursuant to Section 5983:

(a) A first cohort of counties, which shall include the Counties of Glenn, Orange, Riverside, San Diego, Stanislaus, and Tuolumne, and the City and County of San Francisco, shall begin no later than October 1, 2023, unless the county is provided additional time pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(b) A second cohort of counties, representing the remaining population of the state, shall begin no later than December 1, 2024, unless the county is provided additional time pursuant to paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (c).

(c) (1) The department shall issue guidelines under which counties can apply for, and be provided, additional time to implement this part. The guidelines shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) The department shall approve implementation delay for the first or second cohort if the county experiences a state or local emergency and the delay of the provision of the CARE process is necessary as a result of the emergency.

(3) The department shall only grant one extension per county and the final date for counties to implement under any circumstances shall be
 December 1, 2025.

(d) This part shall become operative only upon the department, in consultation with county stakeholders, developing a CARE Act allocation to provide state financial assistance to counties to implement the care process in this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 283, Sec. 3.   (SB 35)   Effective September 30, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5971.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions shall govern the construction of this part.

(a) “CARE agreement” means a voluntary settlement agreement entered into by the parties. A CARE agreement includes the same elements as a CARE plan to support the respondent in accessing community-based services and supports.

(b) “CARE plan” means an individualized, appropriate range of community-based services and supports, as set forth in this part, which include clinically appropriate behavioral health care and stabilization medications, housing, and other supportive services, as appropriate, pursuant to Section 5982.

(c) “CARE process” means the court and related proceedings to implement the CARE Act.

(d) “Clinically stabilized in ongoing voluntary treatment” means both of the following:

(1) The person’s condition is stable and not deteriorating. 

(2) The person is currently engaged in treatment and managing symptoms through medication or other therapeutic interventions. Enrollment in treatment alone shall not be considered clinically stabilized in ongoing voluntary treatment.

(e) “Counsel” means the attorney representing the respondent, appointed pursuant to Section 5977, or chosen by the respondent, in CARE Act
 proceedings and matters related to CARE agreements and CARE plans. Representation of a respondent in these matters does not alter counsel’s obligations under the State Bar Act and the Rules of Professional Conduct, including subdivision (e) of Section 6068 of the Business and Professions Code and rule 1.6 of the Rules of Professional Conduct.

(f) “County behavioral health agency” means the local director of mental health services described in Section 5607, the local behavioral health director, or both as applicable, or their designee.

(g) “Court-ordered evaluation” means an evaluation ordered by a superior court pursuant to Section 5977.1.

(h) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(i) “Graduation plan” means a voluntary agreement entered into by the parties at the end of the CARE program that includes a strategy to support a successful transition out of court jurisdiction and that may include a psychiatric advance directive. A graduation plan includes the same elements as a CARE plan to support the respondent in accessing community-based services and supports. The graduation plan shall not place additional requirements on the local government entities and is not enforceable by the court.

(j) “Homeless outreach worker” means a person who engages people experiencing homelessness to assess for unmet needs, offer information, services, or other assistance, or provide care coordination.

(k) “Indian
 health care provider” means a health care program operated by the Indian Health Service, an Indian tribe, a tribal organization, or urban Indian organization (I/T/U) as those terms are defined in Section 4 of the Indian Health Care Improvement Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1603).

(l) “Legal proceeding” means any administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding, including, but not limited to, juvenile court proceedings and family court proceedings and services, and any form of alternative dispute resolution, including arbitration and mediation, except for the following:

(1) A proceeding under this part.

(2) A proceeding under the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act described in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5979.

(3) A proceeding from which the respondent was referred to CARE Act proceedings as described in Section 5978.

(4) A disciplinary proceeding under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(5) An appeal from any of the proceedings identified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive.

(m) “Licensed behavioral health professional” means either of the following:

(1) A licensed mental health professional, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 4096.

(2) A person who has been granted a waiver
 of licensure requirements by the department pursuant to Section 5751.2.

(n) “Parties” means the petitioner, the respondent, the county behavioral health agency in the county where proceedings under this part are pending, and any local governmental entity added by the court pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 5977.1.

(o) “Petitioner” means the person who files the CARE Act petition with the court. Additionally, if the petitioner is a person listed in Section 5974 other than the director of a county behavioral health agency, or their designee, the petitioner shall have the right to file a petition with the court, but at the initial hearing the court shall substitute the director of a county behavioral health agency, or their designee, of the county in which the
 proceedings are filed as petitioner. The original petitioner may, at the court’s discretion and in furtherance of the interests of the respondent, retain rights as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 5977.

(p) “Psychiatric advance directive” means a legal document, executed on a voluntary basis in accordance with the requirements for advance health care directives in Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4600) of the Probate Code, by a person who has the capacity to make medical decisions, that allows a person with mental illness to protect their autonomy and ability to direct their own care by documenting their preferences for treatment in advance of a mental health crisis.

(q) “Respondent” means the person who is the subject of the petition
 for the CARE process.

(r) “Stabilization medications” means medications included in the CARE plan that primarily consist of antipsychotic medications to reduce symptoms of hallucinations, delusions, and disorganized thinking. Stabilization medications may be administered as long-acting injections if clinically indicated. Stabilization medications shall not be forcibly administered.

(s) “Supporter” means an adult designated by the respondent who assists the person who is the subject of the petition, which assistance may include supporting the person to understand, make, communicate, implement, or act on their own life decisions during the CARE process, including a CARE agreement, a CARE plan, and developing a graduation plan. A supporter shall not act independently.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 528, Sec. 2.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Process [5972. - 5978.2.]

5972.

An individual shall qualify for the CARE process only if all of the following criteria are met:

(a) The person is 18 years of age or older.

(b) The person is currently experiencing a serious mental disorder, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5600.3 and has a diagnosis identified in the disorder class: schizophrenia spectrum and other psychotic disorders, or bipolar I disorder with psychotic features, except psychosis related to current intoxication, as defined in the most current version of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders. This section does not establish respondent eligibility based upon a
 psychotic disorder that is due to a medical condition or is not primarily psychiatric in nature, including, but not limited to, physical health conditions such as traumatic brain injury, autism, dementia, or neurologic conditions. A person who has a current diagnosis of substance use disorder as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1374.72 of the Health and Safety Code but who does not also meet the required criteria in this section shall not qualify for the CARE process.

(c) The person is not clinically stabilized in ongoing voluntary treatment.

(d) At least one of the following is true:

(1) The person is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision and the person’s condition is
 substantially deteriorating.

(2) The person is in need of services and supports in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in grave disability or serious harm to the person or others, as used in Section 5150.

(e) Participation in a CARE plan or CARE agreement would be the least restrictive alternative necessary to ensure the person’s recovery and stability.

(f) It is likely that the person will benefit from participation in a CARE plan or CARE agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 528, Sec. 3.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5973.

(a) Proceedings under this part may be commenced in any of the following:

(1) The county in which the respondent resides.

(2) The county where the respondent is found.

(3) The county where the respondent is facing criminal or civil proceedings.

(b) If the respondent does not reside in the county in which proceedings are initiated under this subdivision, as determined in accordance with Section 244 of the Government Code, except as provided in subdivision (f) of Section 5982, and this part is operative
 in the respondent’s county of residence, the proceeding shall, with the respondent’s consent, be transferred to the county of residence as soon as reasonably feasible. Should the respondent not consent to the transfer, the proceedings shall continue in the county where the respondent was found.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 283, Sec. 6.   (SB 35)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5974.

The following adult persons may file a petition to commence the CARE process:

(a) A person with whom the respondent resides.

(b) A spouse, parent, sibling, child, or grandparent or an individual who stands in loco parentis to the respondent.

(c) The director of a hospital in which the respondent is hospitalized, including hospitalized pursuant to Section 5150 or 5250, or the director’s designee.

(d) The director of a public or charitable organization, agency, or home, or their designee, who has, within the previous 30 days, provided
 or who is currently providing behavioral health services to the respondent or in whose institution the respondent resides.

(e) A licensed behavioral health professional, or their designee, who is, or has been within the previous 30 days, either supervising the treatment of, or treating the respondent for a mental illness.

(f) A first responder, including a peace officer, firefighter, paramedic, emergency medical technician, mobile crisis response worker, or homeless outreach worker, who has had repeated interactions with the respondent in the form of multiple arrests, multiple detentions and transportation pursuant to Section 5150, multiple attempts to engage the respondent in voluntary treatment, or other repeated efforts to aid the respondent in obtaining professional assistance.

(g) The public guardian or public conservator, or their designee, of the county in which the respondent resides or is found.

(h) The director of a county behavioral health agency, or their designee, of the county in which the respondent resides or is found.

(i) The director of county adult protective services, or their designee, of the county in which the respondent resides or is found.

(j) The director of a California Indian health services program, California tribal behavioral health department, who has, within the previous 30 days, provided or who is currently providing behavioral health services to the respondent, or the director’s designee.

(k) The judge of a tribal court located in California before which the respondent has appeared within the previous 30 days, or the judge’s designee.

(l) The respondent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 283, Sec. 7.   (SB 35)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5975.

The Judicial Council shall develop a mandatory form for use to file a CARE process petition with the court and any other forms necessary for the CARE process. The petition shall be signed under the penalty of perjury and contain all of the following:

(a) The name of the respondent and, if known, the respondent’s address.

(b) The petitioner’s relationship to the respondent.

(c) Facts that support the petitioner’s assertion that the respondent meets the CARE criteria in Section 5972.

(d) Either of the following:

(1) An affidavit of a licensed behavioral health professional, including, for purposes of this section only, nurse practitioners as defined in Section 2835 of the Business and Professions Code and physician assistants as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3501 of the Business and Professions Code, stating that the licensed behavioral health professional or their designee has examined the respondent within 60 days of the submission of the petition, or has made multiple attempts to examine, but has not been successful in eliciting the cooperation of the respondent to submit to an examination, within 60 days of the petition, and that the licensed behavioral health professional had determined that the respondent meets, or has reason to believe, explained with specificity in the affidavit, that the respondent meets the diagnostic criteria for CARE
 proceedings.

(2) Evidence that the respondent was detained for a minimum of two intensive treatments pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 5250) of Chapter 2 of Part 1, the most recent one within the previous 60 days. Evidence may include, but is not limited to, documentary evidence from the facility where the respondent was detained, or a signed declaration from the petitioner if the petitioner had personal knowledge of the detentions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 528, Sec. 4.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5975.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 391 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if a person other than the respondent files a petition for CARE Act proceedings that is without merit or is intended to harass or annoy the respondent, and the person has previously filed a pleading in CARE Act proceedings that was without merit or was intended to harass or annoy the respondent, the petition shall be grounds for the court to determine that the person is a vexatious litigant for the purposes of Title 3A (commencing with Section 391) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) (1) If a person other than the respondent files a petition for CARE Act proceedings in order to gain an advantage over the respondent in another legal proceeding, then, notwithstanding any other provision of this part, it is cause for suspension, disbarment, or other discipline if a member of the State Bar is found to have filed the petition or assisted in the filing of the petition with knowledge that the filing was being made in order to gain that advantage.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “legal proceeding” shall not include:

(A) A proceeding under Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5.

(B) A proceeding under Section 300.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 283, Sec. 8.   (SB 35)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5975.2.

CARE Act proceedings may be conducted by a superior court judge or by a court-appointed commissioner or other subordinate judicial officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 283, Sec. 9.   (SB 35)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5975.3.

There shall be no fee for filing under this chapter nor shall any fees be charged by any public officer for services in filing or serving papers or for the performance of any duty enjoined by the CARE Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 283, Sec. 10.   (SB 35)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5976.

The respondent shall:

(a) Receive notice of the hearings.

(b) Receive a copy of the court-ordered evaluation.

(c) Be entitled to be represented by counsel at all stages of a proceeding commenced under this chapter, regardless of the ability to pay.

(d) Be allowed to have a supporter be present with them to perform the functions described in Sections 5980 and 5981, subject to the limits provided in those sections.

(e) Have the right to be present at the hearing
 unless the respondent waives that right.

(f) Have the right to present evidence.

(g) Have the right to call witnesses.

(h) Have the right to cross-examine witnesses.

(i) Have the right to appeal decisions, and to be informed of the right to appeal.

(j) Have the right to an interpreter in all proceedings if necessary for the respondent to fully participate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 283, Sec. 11.   (SB 35)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5976.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as otherwise provided in this section, a hearing held under this part is presumptively closed to the public.

(b) The respondent may demand that the hearing be public and be held in a place suitable for attendance by the public.

(c) The respondent may request the presence of any family member or friend without waiving the right to keep the hearing closed to the rest of the public.

(d) A request by any other party to the proceeding to make the hearing public may be granted if the judicial officer conducting the
 hearing finds that the public interest in an open hearing clearly outweighs the respondent’s interest in privacy.

(e) All reports, evaluations, diagnoses, or other information filed with the court related to the respondent’s health shall be confidential. The respondent may at any time petition the court for an order sealing these records or any other court records in a proceeding held under this part. Notwithstanding any rule of court prohibiting records kept confidential by law from consideration for sealing, if such a petition is filed, there shall exist a presumption in favor of sealing.

(f) The fact that evidence is admitted at a proceeding held under this part shall not be the basis for admission of that evidence in any subsequent legal proceeding.

(g) Photographs, recordings, transcripts, other records of proceedings held under this part, and testimony regarding proceedings held under this part shall not be admissible in any subsequent legal proceeding except upon motion by one of the following in that subsequent legal proceeding:

(1) The respondent.

(2) The county behavioral health agency, the public guardian, or the public conservator.

(h) In a proceeding held under this part, this section shall not affect the applicability of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5977.1, make admissible any evidence that is not otherwise admissible, or permit a witness to base an opinion on any matter that
 is not a proper basis for that opinion. The admission or exclusion of evidence shall be pursuant to the rules of evidence established by the Evidence Code, including, but not limited to, Section 352 of the Evidence Code, and by judicial decision.

(i) Before commencing a hearing at the respondent’s first court appearance, the judicial officer shall inform the respondent of their rights under this section. At subsequent hearings, the court is not required to advise the respondent of their rights under this section upon finding that the respondent understands and waives the additional advisement of their rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 640, Sec. 4.   (SB 42)   Effective September 27, 2024.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 5970.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5977.

(a) (1) The court shall promptly review the petition to determine if the petitioner has made a prima facie showing that the respondent is, or may be, a person described in Section 5972. The court may make a prima facie determination without conducting a hearing.

(2) If the court finds that the petitioner has not made a prima facie showing that the respondent is, or may be, a person described in Section 5972, the court may dismiss the case and, if the court does so, it shall order that the dismissal is without prejudice, unless Section 5975.1 applies. Nothing other than Section 5975.1 prevents a petitioner whose petition was dismissed without prejudice from refiling
 the petition with amended information.

(3) If the court finds that the petitioner has made a prima facie showing that the respondent is, or may be, a person described in Section 5972, the court shall do one of the following:

(A) If the petitioner is the director of a county behavioral health agency, or their designee, the court shall do the following:

(i) Set the matter for an initial appearance on the petition within 14 court days.

(ii) Appoint a qualified legal services project, as defined in Sections 6213 to 6214.5, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code, to represent the respondent. If no legal services project has agreed to accept these appointments,
 a public defender or other counsel working in that capacity shall be appointed to represent the respondent.

(iii) Determine whether the petition includes all of the following information and, if it does not, order the county behavioral health agency to submit a written report with the court within 14 court days that includes all of the following:

(I) A determination as to whether the respondent meets, or is likely to meet, the criteria for the CARE process.

(II) The outcome of efforts made to voluntarily engage the respondent prior to the filing of the petition.

(III) Conclusions and recommendations about the respondent’s ability to voluntarily engage in
 services.

(iv) Order the county behavioral health agency to provide notice to the respondent, the appointed counsel, and the county behavioral health agency in the county where the respondent resides, if different from the county where the CARE process has commenced.
